District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.201

Scope of practice for refrigeration and air conditioning mechanics.

For the purposes of this part, the term “refrigeration and air conditioning mechanic” means a person who designs, installs, maintains or alters mechanical systems for refrigeration or air conditioning of any public or private building or vehicle.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.201.

Prior Codifications